Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.200.020

Home-based instruction—Certain decisions responsibility of parent unless otherwise specified.

The state hereby recognizes that parents who are causing their children to receive home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall be subject only to those minimum state laws and regulations which are necessary to insure that a sufficient basic educational opportunity is provided to the children receiving such instruction. Therefore, all decisions relating to philosophy or doctrine, selection of books, teaching materials and curriculum, and methods, timing, and place in the provision or evaluation of home-based instruction shall be the responsibility of the parent except for matters specifically referred to in this chapter.

[ 1990 c 33 s 179; 1985 c 441 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.27.320.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 441: See note following RCW 28A.225.010.